Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2822
Claim for bodily injury or death; petition or complaint; file; damages.

Subject to the requirements of sections 44-2840 to 44-2846, a patient or his or her representative having a claim under the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act for bodily injury or death on account of alleged malpractice, professional negligence, failure to provide care, breach of contract, or other claim based upon failure to obtain informed consent for an operation or treatment may file a petition or complaint in any court of law having requisite jurisdiction. No dollar amount or figure shall be included in the demand in any malpractice petition or complaint, but the petition shall ask for such damages as are reasonable in the premises.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 22;

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 6.